Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB68.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 148.280 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commission:
(a) Shall have the authority and control of such property as now is under its custody and control, and of
such property as may hereafter be placed under its control or transferred to it by the State Property and
Buildings Commission, for any purpose mentioned in this section;
(b) May erect and repair buildings on the Kentucky Horse Park and make any and all necessary or proper
improvements, and generally carry on a program of development and extension of facilities designed to
accomplish the objectives defined in this section; and
(c) Shall promote the progress of the state and stimulate public interest in the advancement and
development of the state by providing the facilities of the Kentucky Horse Park for exhibitionary,
competitive, and other events relative to various aspects of the horse industry and other functions
calculated to advance and enhance the tourist industry, economy, entertainment, cultural, and
educational interests of the public.
(2) The commission may take, acquire, and hold property, and all interest herein, by deed, gift, devise, bequest,
lease, or by transfer from the state property so acquired in the manner provided by law, and may dispose of
any property so acquired in the manner provided by law.
(3) The commission may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to govern
the operation, maintenance, or use of property under its custody and control, as are necessary to:
(a) Maintain decency and good order;
(b) Protect the peace or safety of the general public;
(c) Protect the public interest, convenience, or necessity;[ and]
(d) Govern the operation, maintenance, or use of the Kentucky Horse Park; and
(e) Exercise the authority granted in subsection (4)(d) of this section.
(4) The commission may:
(a) Employ or contract with other persons, firms, or corporations the commission may deem necessary or
desirable to accomplish its duties and functions; may fix the compensation and the terms of
employment or contract of those employed or contracted with; and may assign to them duties and
responsibilities the commission may determine, including the responsibility of actual operation of any
or all of the facilities under the control of the commission;
(b) Purchase liability insurance for the members and executive officers exempted from the classified
service of the state by KRS 18A.115;[ and]
(c) Operate shows and expositions that support the purpose and function of the Kentucky Horse Park; and
(d) Through the president, eject or exclude from Kentucky Horse Park property any person who engages
or has engaged in conduct that would negatively impact the safety and security of park attendees.
Section 2. KRS 42.740 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established a Geographic Information Advisory Council, attached to the Commonwealth
Office of Technology for administrative purposes, to advise the executive director of the Commonwealth
Office of Technology on issues relating to geographic information and geographic information systems.
(2) The council shall recommend policies and procedures that assist state and local jurisdictions in developing,
deploying, and leveraging geographic information resources and geographic information systems technology
for the purpose of improving public administration.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) The council shall closely coordinate with users of geographic information systems to recommend policies and
procedures that ensure the maximum use of geographic information by minimizing the redundancy of
geographic information and geographic information resources, as well as to ensure that the geographic
information clearinghouse maintained by the Division of Geographic Information Systems meets the needs of
all state agencies.
(4) (a) The Geographic Information Advisory Council shall consist of twenty-five (25) members and one (1)
legislative liaison. The members shall be knowledgeable in the use and application of geographic
information systems technology and shall have sufficient authority within their organizations to
influence the implementation of council recommendations.
(b) The council shall consist of:
1. The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet or his or her designee;
2. The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or his or her designee;
3. The director of the Kentucky Geological Survey or his or her designee;
4. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee;
5. The executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology or her or his designee, who
shall serve as chair;
6. The secretary of the Economic Development Cabinet or his or her designee;
7. The commissioner of the Department for Local Government or his or her designee;
8. The secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or his or her designee;
9. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the
president of the Council on Postsecondary Education;
10. The adjutant general of the Department of Military Affairs or his or her designee;
11. The commissioner of the Department of Education or his or her designee;
12. The secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet or his or her designee;
13. The Commissioner of the Department of Agriculture or his or her designee;
14. The secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet or his or her designee;
15. The executive director of the Office of Property Valuation or his or her designee;
16. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)[six (6)] persons submitted by
the president of the Kentucky League of Cities;
17. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)[six (6)] persons submitted by
the president of the Kentucky Association of Counties;
18. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the
president of the Kentucky Chapter of the American Planning Association;
19. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the
president of the Kentucky Association of Professional Surveyors;
20. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the
president of the Kentucky Society of Professional Engineers;
21. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the
chairman of the Kentucky Board of Registered Geologists;
22. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the
president of the Council of Area Development Districts;
23. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the
president of the Kentucky Association of Mapping Professionals;
24. One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the
executive director of the Kentucky Property Valuation Administrators Association; and

CHAPTER 121 3
25. The executive director of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security.
(c) The council shall have one (1) nonvoting legislative liaison, to be appointed by the Legislative Research
Commission.
(5) The council may have committees and subcommittees as determined by the council or an executive committee,
if an executive committee exists.
(6) A member of the council shall not:
(a) Be an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a business entity that has, or of a trade association for
business entities that have, a substantial interest in the geographic information industry and is doing
business in the Commonwealth;
(b) Own, control, or have, directly or indirectly, more than ten percent (10%) interest in a business entity
that has a substantial interest in the geographic information industry;
(c) Be in any manner connected with any contract or bid for furnishing any governmental body of the
Commonwealth with geographic information systems, the computers on which they are automated, or a
service related to geographic information systems;
(d) Be a person required to register as a lobbyist because of activities for compensation on behalf of a
business entity that has, or on behalf of a trade association of business entities that have, substantial
interest in the geographic information industry;
(e) Accept or receive money or another thing of value from an individual, firm, or corporation to whom a
contract may be awarded, directly or indirectly, by rebate, gift, or otherwise; or
(f) Be liable to civil action or any action performed in good faith in the performance of duties as a council
member.
(7) Those council members specified in subsection (4)(b)[(a)] of this section who serve by virtue of an office shall
serve on the board while they hold that office.
(8) Appointed members of the council shall serve for a term of four (4) years. Vacancies in the membership of the
council shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. If a nominating organization changes
its name, its successor organization having the same responsibilities and purposes shall be the nominating
organization.
(9) The council shall have no funds of its own, and council members shall not receive compensation of any kind
from the council.
(10) A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. Members' designees shall
have voting privileges at council meetings.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version